Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB865.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 5902(a), (b)(1), (2) and (3) and the definition of "urine drug screening" in subsection (d) of Title 35 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes are amended to read:§ 5902. Urine drug screening requirement.(a) General rule.--(1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), if a urine drug screening is conducted in an emergency department within an acute care hospital to assist in diagnosing a patient's condition, the urine drug screening shall include testing for fentanyl, medetomidine and xylazine.(2) The medetomidine and xylazine testing under paragraph (1) shall only be required if testing is available 12345678910111213141516171819 as part of the urine drug screening panel.(b) Reporting.--(1) If the urine drug screening conducted in accordance with subsection (a) detects fentanyl, medetomidine or xylazine, the emergency department shall report the test results, which shall be deidentified, to the department and shall provide informational materials under section 5903(a)(2) (relating to xylazine awareness education) or 5903.1(a)(2) (relating to medetomidine awareness education).(2) The department shall determine the manner of submission of test results.(3) Reporting for fentanyl, medetomidine and xylazine shall occur when results meet a screening threshold set by the department.* * *(d) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *"Urine drug screening." A chemical analysis intended to test a patient for the presence of a controlled substance, medetomidine or xylazine.Section 2. Title 35 is amended by adding a section to read:§ 5903.1. Medetomidine awareness education.(a) Powers and duties.--The Department of Drug and Alcohol Programs, in consultation with the Department of Health and the Department of Agriculture, shall have the power and its duty shall be to:(1) Enter into partnerships with health care providers, including physicians and veterinarians, and community-based 20250SB0865PN0966 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 health centers and hospitals to educate residents of this Commonwealth on the dangers of human use of medetomidine.(2) Create informational materials in electronic and physical form, in coordination with the partners described in paragraph (1), which may be distributed to or accessed by residents of this Commonwealth. The informational materials shall include:(i) The effects on the human body of the use of medetomidine.(ii) How to talk to family and friends about the dangers of human use of medetomidine.(iii) The legitimate uses of medetomidine for animal use.(iv) Any other information the Department of Drug and Alcohol Programs deems necessary to prepare and educate residents of this Commonwealth on the dangers of human use of medetomidine.(b) Expiration.--(1) Upon a determination by the Secretary of Health that the human use of medetomidine no longer poses a significant threat to the public health and safety of the Commonwealth, the Secretary of Health shall transmit notice of the determination to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin.(2) This section shall expire upon publication of the notice under paragraph (1).Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0865PN0966 - 3 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425262728